North Carolina, session 2025, HB888.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of one million dollars
($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated as a directed
grant to the North Carolina Community Health Worker Association, a nonprofit corporation, to
fund the association's continued mobilization, training, and certification of community health
workers for the North Carolina workforce.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H888-v-1*